Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
CHAPTER 39A Statewide Emergency Management Programs
39A.100.
Emergency powers of Governor and local chief executive officers — Report by Governor — Construction of statute — Prohibition of discriminatory action against religious organization — Definitions — Cause of action — Remedies.

In the event of the occurrence or threatened or impending occurrence of any of the situations or events enumerated in KRS

39A.010

,

39A.020

, or

39A.030

, the Governor may declare, in writing, that a state of emergency exists. The Governor shall have and may exercise the following emergency powers during the period in which the state of emergency exists:

To enforce all laws, and administrative regulations relating to disaster and emergency response and to assume direct operational control of all disaster and emergency response forces and activities in the Commonwealth;

To require state agencies and to request local governments, local agencies, and special districts to respond to the emergency or disaster in the manner directed;

To seize, take, or condemn property, for the duration of the emergency, and only for public use as defined in KRS

416.675

, excluding firearms and ammunition, components of firearms and ammunition, or a combination thereof, for the protection of the public or at the request of the President, the Armed Forces, or the Federal Emergency Management Agency of the United States, including:

All means of transportation and communication;

All stocks of fuel of whatever nature;

Food, clothing, equipment, materials, medicines, and all supplies; and

Facilities, including buildings and plants, but excluding houses of worship, except to the extent that such houses have become unsafe to a degree that would justify condemnation in the absence of a state of emergency.

Compensation for property seized, taken, or condemned under this paragraph shall be determined using the process in KRS

416.540

to

416.670

to determine value;

To sell, lend, give, or distribute any of the property under paragraph (c) of this subsection among the inhabitants of the Commonwealth and to account to the State Treasurer for any funds received for the property;

To make compensation for the property seized, taken, or condemned under paragraph (c) of this subsection;

To exclude all nonessential, unauthorized, disruptive, or otherwise uncooperative personnel from the scene of the emergency, and to command those persons or groups assembled at the scene to disperse. A person who refuses to leave an area in which a written order of evacuation has been issued in accordance with a written declaration of emergency or a disaster may be forcibly removed to a place of safety or shelter, or may, if this is resisted, be arrested by a peace officer. Forcible removal or arrest shall not be exercised as options until all reasonable efforts for voluntary compliance have been exhausted;

To declare curfews and establish their limits;

To prohibit or limit the sale or consumption of goods, in the event of a shortage of goods, excluding firearms and ammunition, components of firearms and ammunition, or a combination thereof, or commodities for the duration of the emergency;

To grant emergency authority to pharmacists pursuant to KRS

315.500

, for the duration of the emergency;

To request any assistance from agencies of the United States as necessary and appropriate to meet the needs of the people of the Commonwealth;

Upon the recommendation of the Secretary of State, to declare by executive order a different time or place for holding elections in an election area for which a state of emergency has been declared for part or all of the election area. The election shall be held within thirty-five (35) days from the date of the suspended or delayed election. The executive order shall remain in effect until the date of the suspended or delayed election regardless of the time limitations in KRS

39A.090

and shall not be changed except by action of the General Assembly. The State Board of Elections shall establish procedures for election officials to follow. Any procedures established under this paragraph shall be subject to the approval of the Secretary of State and the Governor by respective executive orders; and

Except as prohibited by this section or other law, to take action necessary to execute those powers enumerated in paragraphs (a) to (k) of this subsection.

Within thirty (30) days of a declared emergency, and every thirty (30) days thereafter, the Governor shall report to the General Assembly, if in session, or to the Legislative Research Commission if the General Assembly is not in session, on a form provided by the Commission detailing:

All expenditures relating to contracts issued during the emergency under KRS

45A.085

or

45A.095

, or under any provision for which a state agency does not solicit bids or proposals for a contract; and

All revenues received from the federal government in response to the declared emergency, any expenditures or expenditure plan for the federal funds by federal program, the state agency or program that was allocated the federal funds, and any state fund expenditures required to match the federal funds.

In the event of the occurrence or threatened or impending occurrence of any of the situations or events contemplated by KRS

39A.010

,

39A.020

, or

39A.030

, which in the judgment of a local chief executive officer is of such severity or complexity as to require the exercise of extraordinary emergency measures, the county judge/executive of a county other than an urban-county government, or mayor of a city or urban-county government, or chief executive of other local governments or their designees as provided by ordinance of the affected county, city, or urban-county may declare in writing that a state of emergency exists, and thereafter, subject to any orders of the Governor, shall have and may exercise for the period as the state of emergency exists or continues, the following emergency powers:

To enforce all laws and administrative regulations relating to disaster and emergency response and to direct all local disaster and emergency response forces and operations in the affected county, city, urban-county, or charter county;

To exclude all nonessential, unauthorized, disruptive, or uncooperative personnel from the scene of the emergency, and to command persons or groups of persons at the scene to disperse. A person who refuses to leave an area in which a written order of evacuation has been issued in accordance with a written declaration of emergency or a disaster may be forcibly removed to a place of safety or shelter, or may, if this is resisted, be arrested by a peace officer. Forcible removal or arrest shall not be exercised as options until all reasonable efforts for voluntary compliance have been exhausted;

To declare curfews and establish their limits;

To order immediate purchase or rental of, contract for, or otherwise procure, without regard to procurement codes or budget requirements, the goods and services essential for protection of public health and safety or to maintain or to restore essential public services; and

To request emergency assistance from any local government or special district and, through the Governor, to request emergency assistance from any state agency and to initiate requests for federal assistance as are necessary for protection of public health and safety or for continuation of essential public services.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow any governmental entity to impose additional restrictions on:

The lawful possession, transfer, sale, transport, carrying, storage, display, or use of firearms and ammunition or components of firearms and ammunition;

The right of the people to exercise free speech, freedom of the press, to petition their government for redress of injuries, or to peaceably assemble; or

The right of the people to worship, worship in person, or to act or refuse to act in a manner motivated by a sincerely held religious belief.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow any governmental entity to impose restrictions on the right of the people to:

Peaceably assemble; or

Worship, worship in person, or to act or refuse to act in a manner motivated by a sincerely held religious belief.

A governmental entity shall not prohibit or restrict a religious organization from operating or engaging in religious services during a declared emergency to the same or any greater extent than other organizations or businesses that provide essential services necessary and vital to the health and welfare of the public are prohibited or restricted.

Paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not prohibit the Governor from requiring religious organizations to comply with neutral health, safety, or occupancy requirements that are applicable to all organizations and businesses that provide essential services. However, no health, safety, or occupancy requirement may impose a substantial burden on a religious organization or its services unless applying the burden to the religion or religious service in the particular instance is essential to further a compelling governmental interest and is the least restrictive means of furthering that compelling governmental interest.

A governmental entity shall not take any discriminatory action against a religious organization.

As used in this section:

“Discriminatory action” includes any action taken by a governmental entity wholly or partially on the basis that such organization is religious, operates or seeks to operate during a state of emergency, or engages in the exercise of religion as protected under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States to:

Adversely alter in any way the tax treatment of, cause any tax, penalty, or payment to be assessed against, or deny, delay, or otherwise make unavailable an exemption from taxation;

Disallow, deny, or otherwise make unavailable a deduction for state tax purposes of any charitable contribution made to or by a religious organization;

Impose, levy, or assess a monetary fine, fee, civil or criminal penalty, damages award, or injunction; or

Withhold, reduce, exclude, terminate, adversely alter the terms or conditions of, or otherwise make unavailable or deny any:

State grant, contract, subcontract, cooperative agreement, guarantee, loan, scholarship, or other similar benefit from or to a religious organization;

Entitlement or benefit under a state benefit program from or to a religious organization; or

License, certification, accreditation, recognition, or other similar benefit, position, or status from or to any religious organization;

“Governmental entity” means:

The Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions;

Any agency of the state described in KRS

12.020

;

Any person acting under color of state law; and

Any private person suing under or attempting to enforce a law, rule, or administrative regulation adopted by the state or any of its political subdivisions;

“Religious organization” means:

A house of worship, including churches, synagogues, shrines, mosques, and temples;

A religious group, corporation, association, educational institution, ministry, order, society, or similar entity, regardless of whether it is integrated or affiliated with a church or other house of worship; or

Any officer, owner, employee, manager, religious leader, clergy, or minister of an entity or organization described in this paragraph; and

“Religious services” means a meeting, gathering, or assembly of two (2) or more persons organized by a religious organization for the purpose of worship, teaching, training, providing educational services, conducting religious rituals, or other activities that are deemed necessary by the religious organization for the exercise of religion.

A religious organization may assert a violation of subsection (4)(c), (5)(b), or (6) of this section as a claim against a governmental entity in any judicial or administrative proceeding or as a defense in any judicial or administrative proceeding without regard to whether the proceeding is brought by or in the name of the governmental entity, any private person, or any other party. Sovereign, governmental, and qualified immunity are waived to the extent of liability created under this section. An action asserting a violation of this section may be commenced, and relief may be granted, without regard to whether the religious organization commencing the action has sought or exhausted administrative remedies.

Remedies available to a religious organization under this section against a governmental entity include:

Declaratory relief;

Injunctive relief to prevent or remedy a violation of this section or the effects of such violation;

Compensatory damages for pecuniary and nonpecuniary losses;

Reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs; and

Any other appropriate relief.

Remedies available to a religious organization under this section against a person not acting under color of state law shall be limited to declaratory and injunctive relief.

This section:

Shall be construed in favor of a broad protection of free exercise of religion;

Shall be in addition to the protections provided under state and federal laws and constitutions. Nothing in this section shall be construed to:

Preempt or repeal any state law or local ordinance that is equally or more protective of free exercise of religion; or

Narrow the meaning or application of any state law or local ordinance protecting free exercise of religion; and

Applies to, and in cases of conflict, supersedes:

Each statute of the Commonwealth that infringes upon the free exercise of religion protected by this section, unless a conflicting statute is expressly made exempt from the application of this section; and

Any ordinance, rule, administrative regulation, order, opinion, decision, practice, or other exercise of a governmental entity’s authority that infringes upon the free exercise of religion protected by this section.

A religious organization shall bring an action to assert a claim under this section no later than two (2) years from the date the person knew or should have known that a discriminatory action or other violation of this section was taken against that religious organization.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 9, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 91, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 7, §
1, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 240, § 10, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 22, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2020 ch. 91, § 74, effective April 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 6, § 3, effective February 2, 2021; 2021 ch. 197, § 75, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

39A.110.
Compensation for property taken for temporary use — Notice to owner of property where title taken.

If property is taken for temporary use, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the Governor shall, within thirty (30) days of the taking, fix the amount of compensation to be paid for the property. If the property is returned to the owner in a damaged condition or is not returned to the owner, the Governor shall, within thirty (30) days after the taking, fix the amount of compensation to be paid for the damage or failure to return. When the Governor deems it advisable for the state to take title to property taken under this section, the owner shall be notified in writing by certified mail, return receipt requested, and a copy of the notice shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 10, effective July 15, 1998.

39A.120.
Procedure when owner refuses to accept compensation fixed by Governor.

If the owner of any property seized, taken, or condemned pursuant to KRS

39A.110

refuses to accept as adequate the compensation fixed by the Governor, the owner may present a claim to the Board of Claims, which shall hear and determine it according to the provisions of KRS

49.040

to

49.180

and the administrative regulations of the board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 74, § 56, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 8, effective June 29, 2021.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Board of Claims, KRS

44.070

.

39A.130.
Appeal from award of Board of Claims.

The owner of property seized, taken, or condemned may appeal from the award of the Board of Claims to the Circuit Court of the county of the owner’s residence. The Rules of Civil Procedure shall, so far as applicable, govern the procedure on appeal. A trial de novo shall not be allowed unless the record on appeal is not sufficient to determine the matter from the record, but if the action is tried, it shall be tried according to the practice prescribed for the trial of jury cases.

An appeal from the judgment of Circuit Court may be taken to the Court of Appeals.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 12, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 74, § 57, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 9, effective June 29, 2021.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Appeals to Court of Appeals, KRS

22A.020

.

39A.140.
Procedure for payment of compensation.

If the owner of property seized, taken, or condemned accepts as adequate the compensation fixed by the Governor, the owner shall file a statement of the amount of compensation from the Governor with the Finance and Administration Cabinet, which shall draw a warrant on the State Treasurer for the amount of the compensation in favor of the person entitled to payment.

If the compensation is determined by award of the Kentucky Board of Claims or judgment of a court, as provided in KRS

39A.110

,

39A.120

, and

39A.130

, a certified copy of the award or judgment shall be filed with the Finance and Administration Cabinet which shall draw a warrant on the State Treasurer for the amount of the award or judgment.

The State Treasurer shall pay the warrants out of any money in the Treasury not otherwise appropriated.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 13, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 74, § 58, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 10, effective June 29, 2021.

39A.150.
Traffic control plans — Executive orders.

The Kentucky Emergency Operations Plan and local emergency operations plans shall include measures for, and the Governor for the state or portion thereof, the county judge/executive for a county other than an urban-county, or a portion thereof, and the mayor for a city or an urban-county or portion thereof, may issue written executive orders providing for:

The control of traffic in order to provide for rapid and safe movement in evacuation over public highways and streets during any disaster or emergency;

The control and alteration of speed limits and traffic regulations on public highways during any disaster or emergency; and

The prohibition or limitation of use of motor vehicles on public highways during any disaster or emergency.

The Governor may extend the provisions of subsection (1) of this section to the public thoroughfares of any political subdivision of the Commonwealth.

The Governor may order agencies of state government and political subdivisions of the Commonwealth to take steps necessary to effectuate plans made or orders issued pursuant to this section.

During a declared emergency or disaster, the Governor, county judge/executive, or mayor, may, for their respective jurisdictions, place these plans in effect.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 14, effective July 15, 1998.

39A.160.
Witnesses — Production of records and documents.

For the purpose of making surveys and investigations and obtaining information which may be necessary to the operation or enforcement of KRS Chapters 39A to 39F, the Governor, or the director with the written approval of the Governor, may compel by subpoena the attendance of witnesses, and the production of books, papers, records, and documents of individuals, firms, associations, and corporations. All officers, boards, commissions, and divisions of the state, the political subdivisions thereof, and special districts, having information which is the subject of the investigation, shall cooperate with and assist the Governor or the director in making the investigation and surveys.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 15, effective July 15, 1998.

39A.170.
Lease or loan of real or personal property of state government — Disaster and emergency response activities of state employees.

Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the Governor may, when it is found to be in the public interest:

Authorize any division or agency of the state to lease or lend, on such terms and conditions as deemed necessary to promote the public welfare and protect the interests of the state, any real or personal property of the state government to the President of the United States, the chiefs of the Armed Forces, or to the Federal Emergency Management Agency;

Enter into a contract on behalf of the state for the lease or loan to any political subdivision of the state on such terms and conditions as may be deemed necessary to promote the public welfare and protect the interests of the state, of any real or personal property of the state government, or the temporary transfer or employment of personnel of the state government to or by any political subdivision of the state; and

Permit state employees to engage in disaster and emergency response activities, within or without the state, for the division, or for a local jurisdiction upon request of a local emergency management agency to the division. State employees assigned to or volunteering for this duty shall be considered as being employed by the agency by which they are regularly employed and shall continue to receive salary and benefits while engaging in disaster and emergency response work.

The permission of the Governor for the use of state employees in the manner specified in subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be presumed, and shall be automatic unless the Governor specifies otherwise with regard to the use of a specific employee or employees.

The Chief Justice for the Court of Justice and the Director of the Legislative Research Commission, with regard to employees of their respective branches of government, may permit Court of Justice and legislative employees to engage in disaster and emergency services work under the same terms and conditions as specified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 16, effective July 15, 1998.

39A.180.
Orders and administrative regulations of Governor, agencies, and political subdivisions — Suspension of statutes — Conformity of administrative regulations — Enforcement.

The political subdivisions of the state and other agencies designated or appointed by the Governor may make, amend, and rescind orders and promulgate administrative regulations necessary for disaster and emergency response purposes, and to supplement the carrying out of the provisions of this chapter, if not inconsistent with any orders or administrative regulations promulgated by the Governor or by any state agency exercising a power delegated to it by the Governor.

All written orders and administrative regulations promulgated by the Governor, the director, or by any political subdivision or other agency authorized by KRS Chapters 39A to 39F to make orders and promulgate administrative regulations, shall have the full force of law and, if promulgated as administrative regulations, shall follow the requirements for promulgating administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A. All written orders authorized by KRS Chapters 39A to 39F shall be filed with the Legislative Research Commission.

The Governor may suspend a statute by executive order when an emergency is declared under this chapter if:

The statute is specifically enumerated by the Governor in the executive order; and

The executive order specifying the suspension is approved by the Attorney General in writing.

A statute suspension authorized in paragraph (b) of this subsection shall only be in effect while the emergency executive order is in effect.

Any existing administrative regulation that conflicts with a written order issued under this chapter shall be amended, withdrawn, or repealed in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to conform with the written order.

When a written order ends, any administrative regulation promulgated under the authority of this section shall:

Become void; and

Be withdrawn, amended, or repealed in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the Governor shall not suspend any laws in KRS Chapters 39A to 39F, Chapter 13A,

446.350

,

527.020

,

311.710

to

311.820

, or any other statutes related to abortion.

The law enforcement authorities of the state and of its counties, urban- counties, charter counties, and cities shall enforce the written orders and administrative regulations issued pursuant to KRS Chapters 39A to 39F.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 17, effective July 15, 1998; 2021 ch. 6, § 4, effective February 2, 2021.

39A.190.
Power of arrest for violation of order or administrative regulation.

A peace officer, when in full and distinctive uniform or displaying a badge or other insignia of authority, may arrest without a warrant any person violating or attempting to violate in the officer’s presence any order or administrative regulation made pursuant to this chapter, or KRS Chapter 39B, 39C, 39D, 39E, or 39F.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 18, effective July 15, 1998.

39A.200.
Authority to receive services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds from federal government.

When the federal government or any agency or officer thereof shall offer to the state, or through the state to any political subdivision thereof, services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of gift, grant, or loan, for purposes of disaster and emergency response, the state, acting through the Governor, or the political subdivision, acting through its chief executive or governing body, may accept the offer and upon acceptance the Governor of the state or chief executive or governing body of the political subdivision may authorize any officer of the state or of the political subdivision, as the case may be, to receive the services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds on behalf of the state or the political subdivision, and subject to the terms of the offer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 19, effective July 15, 1998.

39A.210.
Qualifications and oath of persons connected with disaster and emergency response organizations.

No person shall be employed or associated in any capacity in any disaster and emergency response organization established under this chapter who advocates a change by force or violence in the constitutional form of the government of the United States or in this state or the overthrow of any government in the United States by force or violence, or who has been convicted of or is under indictment or information charging any subversive act against the United States. Each person who is appointed to serve in an organization for disaster and emergency response shall, before entering upon his or her duties, take an oath, in writing, before a person authorized to administer oaths in this Commonwealth, which shall be as follows:

“I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of this Commonwealth and be faithful and true to the Commonwealth of Kentucky so long as I continue a citizen thereof, and that I will faithfully execute, to the best of my ability, the office of emergency management director according to law;

And I do further solemnly swear (or affirm) that since the adoption of the present Constitution, I, being a citizen of this state, have not fought a duel with deadly weapons within this state, nor out of it, nor have I sent or accepted a challenge to fight a duel with deadly weapons, nor have I acted as second in carrying a challenge, nor aided or assisted any person thus offended, so help me God.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 20, effective July 15, 1998.

39A.220.
Agency emergency operations procedures.

Each agency, board, or commission of state government, unless the requirement is waived, in writing, by the director, shall develop agency emergency operations procedures which are consistent with and which meet the requirements of the Kentucky Emergency Operations Plan. The agency emergency operations procedures shall be updated not less than yearly.

Each agency, board, or commission of state government shall take those measures necessary to ensure that it can continue to operate during times of disaster or emergency, that it can protect its vital records, and that it has designated at least four (4) persons, preferably by title, who may act for the agency, and for its major component operations, during an emergency or disaster if the primary person with the power to make necessary decisions is unavailable for any reason.

In carrying out the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, each agency, board, or commission of state government shall follow the general planning guidance of the division and the requirements of administrative regulations promulgated by the division.

Each agency, board, or commission of state government shall train its employees with regard to the contents of the agency emergency operations procedures, and shall give any additional training necessary to implement the procedures during times of emergency or disaster.

Each agency, board, or commission of state government shall, upon request of the director, send an employee of the agency with full authority to take any action on behalf of the agency to the State Emergency Operations Center, area offices of the division, state command posts or other designated location during periods of emergency or disaster.

As used in this section, agency, board, or commission means all agencies, unless the requirement is waived, in writing, by the director, listed in KRS

12.020

, other state bodies created by executive order of the Governor, the Legislative Research Commission, and the Court of Justice and its agencies.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 21, effective July 15, 1998.

39A.230.
Procedures for one multirisk, multiagency, unified incident command or management system.

The Kentucky Emergency Operations Plan shall include procedures for one multirisk, multiagency, unified incident command or management system to be used by all state agencies responding to the scene of an emergency, declared emergency, disaster, or catastrophe, as contemplated by KRS

39A.010

,

39A.020

, or

39A.030

.

Local emergency operations plans shall include procedures for:

An incident command or management system to be used by individual local agencies or departments when responding to the scene of day-to-day, routine emergency incidents; and

One unified incident command or management system to be used by all local agencies or departments when responding to the scene of a multiagency or multijurisdictional emergency, declared emergency, disaster, or catastrophe, as contemplated by KRS

39A.010

,

39A.020

, or

39A.030

.

All incident command or management system procedures required pursuant to subsections (1) or (2) of this section shall be based upon or utilize the five (5) functions of: command, operations, planning, logistics, and finance.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 22, effective July 15, 1998.

39A.240.
State Emergency Operations Center — Agency representatives.

The division shall maintain the State Emergency Operations Center and those alternate locations deemed necessary, and shall activate the State Emergency Operations Center when deemed necessary by the director, the Adjutant General, or the Governor.

Each cabinet of state government, and each independent agency of state government, and other organizations provided for in the Kentucky Emergency Operations Plan shall immediately send a designated person to the State Emergency Operations Center upon request of the director, during a time of emergency or disaster or the threatened or impending happening of such an incident. They shall remain at the State Emergency Operations Center until relieved and replaced, unless released by the director.

Persons representing agencies of state government or other organizations assigned to the State Emergency Operations Center during times of emergency or disaster or the threatened or impending happening thereof may obligate the funds, equipment, and personnel of the organization which they represent, and make decisions on behalf of the organization which they represent.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 23, effective July 15, 1998.

39A.250.
[Superseded by KRS 39A.280.]

39A.260.
Mutual aid agreements with other states — Workers’ compensation.

The division may enter into agreements with other states with regard to mutual aid for routine provision of emergency management services or for mutual aid during times of emergency or disaster, or any combination of these.

Kentucky emergency management personnel, either working for the state or local government or affiliated with the state or a local government, paid or volunteer, shall, to the extent provided by the law of the host state, have the same rights and privileges as they have in Kentucky.

Emergency management personnel, either working for the state or a local government or affiliated with the state or a local government of another state, paid or volunteer, shall, to the extent provided by Kentucky law, have the same rights and privileges as do Kentucky emergency management personnel working for the state or local government or affiliated with the state or a local government, whether paid or volunteer. This provision shall not apply to the provision of peace officer services, unless approved in writing by the Governor, or the General Assembly, as appropriate for the specific incident.

Kentucky emergency management-provided workers’ compensation shall apply to a state or local emergency management agency worker, paid or volunteer, or worker in an operating unit officially affiliated with the division, or worker in a local emergency management agency-supervised operating unit officially affiliated with a local disaster and emergency services organization pursuant to KRS

39B.070

, who is serving in another state pursuant to an agreement consummated under this section.

An emergency management worker from another state, paid or volunteer, who is working for or affiliated with the state emergency management agency and who is serving in Kentucky pursuant to an agreement consummated under this section may be accorded Kentucky emergency management workers’ compensation coverage by action of the director.

The provisions of subsections (4) and (5) of this section shall not apply to hazardous materials emergency response operations defined in 29 C.F.R. 1910.120 which are above the first-responder operations level, on-scene incident commander level excluded.

An emergency management worker from another state, paid or volunteer, who is working for the state emergency management agency or a local emergency management agency or a worker in an organization affiliated with the state or local emergency management agency of another state who holds license or certification from the worker’s state to practice a profession, or paraprofessional activity, or other activity for which a license or certification is required to practice that activity in Kentucky shall be, for the period of that work, under an agreement consummated pursuant to this chapter, considered as properly licensed or certified in Kentucky to perform the services granted by the worker’s license or certification. The worker shall, however, while in Kentucky, be subject to discipline by the appropriate Kentucky licensing or certifying agency for acts of misconduct or negligence which are committed in Kentucky.

City, county, urban-county, or charter county emergency management agencies in Kentucky may make written agreements with similar local emergency management agencies in adjoining states if the agreements are submitted to the state emergency management agencies of both states and are approved in writing by the directors of both agencies. Agreements pursuant to this section shall be subject to the same rights and privileges as state agreements under this section, but shall be limited to two (2) years, unless renewed by submission of a new agreement for approval.

The provisions of this section shall be subject to the provisions of all applicable federal law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 25, effective July 15, 1998.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Workers’ Compensation, KRS Ch. 342.

39A.270.
Use of publicly owned resources at impending, happening, or response phase of disaster or emergency.

During the threatened or impending happening of a disaster or emergency, the Governor, the Adjutant General, or the Director may authorize the use of public employees, equipment, supplies, materials, funds, or any other publicly owned or supported resources to assist in the mitigation of the potential effects of the disaster or emergency, regardless of whether the use is on public or private property.

During the actual happening of and any part of the response phase of a disaster or emergency the Governor, the Adjutant General, or the Director, shall, when necessary or desirable, authorize the use of public employees, equipment, supplies, materials, funds, or any other publicly owned or supported resource to assist in the operations of government, or the private sector, necessary to deal with the disaster or emergency, regardless of whether the use is on public or private property.

During the actual happening or any part of the response phase of a disaster or declared emergency, the Governor or the General Assembly may, by executive action, legislation, or administrative regulation promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A, declare which of the following services, if any, are essential:

Those individuals and businesses that are necessary to deal with the response to the disaster or declared emergency or that protect the life and health of Kentucky citizens;

Individuals and businesses that are engaged in conduct, business, or an activity that otherwise constitutes a critical infrastructure sector as determined by the United States Department of Homeland Security’s Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security Agency, or its successor; or

Individuals and businesses that are charged with responsibility for a governmental function related to a declared emergency or that is not in the ordinary course of conduct or business, including responsibilities that require changes to the medical, manufacturing, or educational environment in which they typically operate.

After the active or response phase of the disaster or emergency has passed and the recovery phase has begun, the Governor, the Adjutant General, or the Director may authorize the use of public employees, equipment, supplies, funds, or any other publicly owned or supported resources to assist in the recovery phase of the disaster or emergency, regardless of whether the use is on public or private property.

A formal declaration of disaster or emergency shall not be necessary to invoke the provisions of subsection (1) or (2) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 26, effective July 15, 1998; 2021 ch. 205, § 5, effective April 11, 2021.